Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 10

General Provisions

4-13-1001. Sale or transfer of land containing historically significant buildings or adjacent to such land.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, subject to the approval by the state building commission, the state is authorized to sell or negotiate a transfer of any parcel of land that contains a building having historical significance, or is immediately adjacent to a parcel of land that contains a building having historical significance under the following conditions:

No public funds are being appropriated for maintenance or preservation of the property;

The state is not maintaining or preserving the property; and

The use of the property is not available to the general public.

Acts 1996, ch. 960, § 1.

4-13-1002. Qualifying nonprofit organizations.

Properties specified in §4-13-1001 shall be sold or transferred to a nonprofit organization that has the capability and plans to maintain and preserve the property and to open the property for general viewing of or other use by the general public.

Acts 1996, ch. 960, § 1.

4-13-109. Trust property not state property.

4-13-404. Actual custody and control of property.

4-13-602. Administration, operation and maintenance.